Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 10 Water and Sewer District Law

Cross references. —

As to irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-101

through

41-6-507

.

As to watershed improvement districts, see §§

41-8-101

through

41-8-126

.

For constitutional provisions relative to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 10.

As to sanitary and improvement districts, see §§

35-3-101

through

35-3-107

,

35-3-109

through

35-3-124

and

41-10-148

.

Exception to public service commission's jurisdiction is provided by this chapter.

Public Serv. Comm'n v. Formal Complaint of WWZ Co., 641 P.2d 183,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

70C Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessment § 1 et seq.

17A C.J.S Contracts § 222.

§ 41-10-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] the following words or phrases shall be defined as follows:

“District” shall mean any district organized or proposed to be organized in the case of organizational provisions pursuant to this act;

“Water district” shall mean any district organized to acquire any water project for the purpose of supplying water for domestic purposes by any available means, the treatment of such water, and its distribution, for which purposes the district shall have power to acquire water rights, treatment facilities and lines for a water system, and appurtenant facilities, within and without its corporate limits;

“Sewer district” shall mean any district organized to acquire any sewer project for the purpose of providing sanitary sewers, treatment facilities, disposal plant or other treatment and disposal works, and appurtenant facilities, or storm sewers, flood and surface drainage works, and appurtenant facilities, or providing both such sanitary and storm sewers, works and facilities, and providing all necessary, proper or desirable equipment and appurtenances incident thereto;

“Water and sewer district” shall mean any district organized to acquire any such water and sewer project. A district may or may not be created for a combination of water and sewer purposes;

“Board” shall mean the board of directors of a district and shall be the governing legislative body thereof. The board shall act whenever any other relevant act empowers or requires action by the city council, town council or other governing body of a municipality;

“Directors” shall mean the members of a board;

“Acquisition” or “acquire” shall mean the acquisition by purchase, construction, installation, reconstruction, condemnation, lease, rent, gift, grant, bequest, devise, contract or other acquisition as may be deemed necessary or desirable by the board, or any combination thereof;

“Improvement” or “improve” shall mean the extension, betterment, alteration, reconstruction, repair or other improvement as may be deemed necessary or desirable by the board, or any combination thereof;

“Equipment” or “equip” shall mean furnishing all necessary or desirable, related or appurtenant, facilities, or any combination thereof;

“Project” shall mean any structure, facility, undertaking or system which a district is authorized to acquire, improve, equip, maintain or operate. A project may consist of all kinds of personal and real property, including but not limited to land, improvements and fixtures thereon, property of any nature appurtenant thereto or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right therein, legal or equitable, including terms for years, or any combination thereof;

and (xii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

An “election” authorized under this act shall be held, conducted and governed as nearly as practicable according to the Special District Elections Act of 1994 as supplemented by this act;

through (J) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

“Publication” or “publish” for provisions other than election provisions, shall mean publication for at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks by three (3) weekly insertions in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in the district, the first publication in the district being at least fifteen (15) days prior to the designated time or event. It shall not be necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three (3) calendar weeks, but not less than fourteen (14) days shall intervene between the first publication and the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the day of the last publication. Publication requirements for any election under this act shall be as specifically provided in this act, or if not specifically provided in this act, as required in the Special District Elections Act of 1994;

A “resolution” adopted by at least a majority of the directors present constituting a quorum in meeting duly assembled, unless the bylaws of the district require a greater number, shall constitute the formal written instrument by which a board shall act in the exercise of any legislative power or upon a permanent matter, or both. Otherwise a board may act by resolution or verbal motion so adopted. Whenever any other relevant act empowers or requires action by ordinance of the city council, town council or other governing body of a municipality, the board shall act by resolution;

and (xvii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

For purposes of this act and application of the Special District Elections Act of 1994 to this act, the term “electors” or “voters” include qualified electors as defined in W.S. 22-29-104(a)(v) and landowners as defined in W.S. 22-29-104(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.1; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1994, ch. 29, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 2013 ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b).

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), substituted “22-29-104(a)(v)” for “22-39-104(a)(iv).

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, made the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 41-10-102.
Lands included in district.

A district may include all or a portion of the unincorporated area in a county in the state of Wyoming.

No lands included in any city or town shall be included in any district without the written consent of the governing body of the city or town.

No tract of twenty (20) acres or more shall be included in any district without the written consent of each person having legal (as distinguished from equitable) title to the tract.

A district may consist of noncontiguous tracts or parcels of land.

No area within a district may be annexed to a city or town, but nothing herein contained shall be construed as preventing the dissolution of a district or the exclusion therefrom of any land therein as herein authorized for the purpose of permitting such an annexation, or as prohibiting an annexation in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

41-10-152

through

41-10-157

.

No two (2) districts created under this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] for the same purpose may overlap each other, but nothing herein contained shall be construed as preventing any tract or parcel of land being simultaneously situate in a water district and in a separate sewer district.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.2; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 2001, ch. 130, § 1.

Consent of owner. —

Property owner's objection, on the ground that it had not consented under this section, to the inclusion of its property in a water and sewer district was barred by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 41-10-107(g) because the owner did not follow the procedure specified for a challenge to the organization of a district.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Narrow Reapportionment Holding with Broad Implications for Wyoming.Brown v. Thomson, 462 U.S. 835, 103 S. Ct. 2690, 77 L. Ed. 2d 214, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 78 (1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 253 (1984).

§ 41-10-103.
Establishment of districts; jurisdiction of board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners for any county in this state is hereby vested with the jurisdiction, power and authority to establish districts.

The board of county commissioners in which the petition for the organization of a district has been filed shall thereafter for all purposes of this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] maintain and have original and exclusive jurisdiction as to any and all proceedings concerning the district coextensive with the boundaries of the district and of the territory which may be proposed to be included in the district and of the property proposed to be included in the district or affected by the district.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 2.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.3; Laws 1983, ch. 176, §§ 1, 2.

Removal of property from district. —

Although a board of county commissioners had authority under this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

41-10-120

to remove property from a water and sewer district, the lapse or sunsetting of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-29-307

left no statutory procedure available for doing so; thus, an owner's petition objecting to the inclusion of its property was properly dismissed.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 41-10-104.
Organization of districts; information required in the petition.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A petition to establish a district under this act shall conform to the requirements in the Special District Elections Act of 1994. The petition for organization shall also set forth:

The name of the proposed district, consisting of a chosen name preceding the words “water district,” or “sewer district,” or “water and sewer district”;

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

The source of water to be used within the proposed district including an estimate of the amount to be used based upon a measurement in gallons of water use per day and a showing that the source is adequate to meet the projected needs of the district;

A detailed description of proposed water service mains, sewer service mains, pump and lift stations servicing mains, distribution or treatment facilities for water or sewer or both and method and place of discharge of wastewater, sewage or both. The board of county commissioners may waive this requirement pending the approval of the remainder of the petition by the commissioners. However, no construction may begin until the detailed description required by this paragraph has been submitted to and approved by the board of county commissioners;

A showing that the proposed improvement or improvements or service or services is compatible with any adopted area-wide facilities plan or intergovernmental agreement in effect at the time of such petition;

In the event the proposed district or a portion thereof is located within two (2) miles of any city or town the standards to be used in the construction of the facilities of the proposed district shall also be included. These standards shall be no less stringent than the most stringent standards of the nearest local government entity which is within the two (2) mile limitation.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

The provisions of the petition seeking the establishment of the district shall not be considered to be a limitation on the rights of the board to submit a bond issue in whatever amount and for whatever improvement or to take any other action authorized herein which the board may find necessary or desirable after the district is organized.

and (g) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.4; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5.

§ 41-10-105.
Bond or cash deposit required at time of filing of petition; authority of board to require additional bond or deposit.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on the petition a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the board of county commissioners, or a cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district be not effected. If at any time during the proceeding the board of county commissioners shall be satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposit is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten (10) days distant, and upon failure of the petitioner to execute or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.5; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1.

§ 41-10-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Law 1959, ch. 185, § 6, related to the procedure for scheduling a hearing on a petition.

§ 41-10-107.
Election in connection with establishment.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

At the formation election the voters shall vote for or against the formation of the district, and for five (5) electors of the district, who shall constitute the board of directors of the district, if organized, to serve until the next regular subsequent director election.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

The canvassing board shall certify the returns of the election to the board of county commissioners. If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the formation, the board of county commissioners shall declare the district organized and give the district the corporate name designated in the petition, by which it shall thereafter be known in all proceedings, and shall designate the first board of directors elected. Thereupon the district shall be a governmental subdivision of the state of Wyoming and a body corporate with all the powers of a public or quasi-municipal corporation.

A resolution of the board of county commissioners establishing the district shall be considered final and no petition in error nor other appeal shall lie therefrom. The resolution of the board of county commissioners shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the district against all persons except the state of Wyoming, in an action in the nature of a writ of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney general within thirty (30) days after the resolution declaring the district as organized and not otherwise. The organization of the district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action or proceeding except as expressly authorized in this subsection.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.7; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 1999, ch. 162, § 1; 2013 ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “taxpaying” before “electors” in (d).

Challenge to organization of district. —

Property owner's objection, on the ground of lack of consent under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 41-10-102(c), to the inclusion of its property in a water and sewer district was barred by this section because the owner did not follow the procedure specified for a challenge to the organization of a district.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 41-10-108.
Copy of resolution establishing district to be transmitted to secretary of state by the county clerk; filing; fee.

Within thirty (30) days after the district has been declared established by the board of county commissioners, the resolution shall be recorded by the county clerk in the county where the district lies and the county clerk shall transmit to the secretary of state a copy of the resolution establishing the district. The resolution shall be filed in the same manner as articles of incorporation are now required to be filed under the general laws concerning corporations. The secretary of state shall receive a fee of three dollars ($3.00) for filing and preserving the same.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.8; Laws 1981, ch. 47, § 1; 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 41-10-109.
Members of original board of directors to qualify by filing oath of office and bond with county clerk.

Whenever a district has been declared organized, the members of the board shall qualify by filing with the county clerk their oaths of office, and corporate surety bonds at the expense of the district in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) each, the form thereof to be fixed and approved by the board of county commissioners, conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties as directors.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.9; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1.

§ 41-10-110.
Original board generally.

After taking oath and filing bonds, the board shall choose one (1) of its members as chairman of the board, and president of the district, another member as vice-chairman and vice-president; and the board shall elect a secretary and a treasurer of the board and of the district, who may, or may not, be members of the board. The secretary and the treasurer may be one (1) person.

Such board shall adopt a seal and the secretary shall keep, in a well-bound book, a record of all of its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by employees and all corporate acts which shall be open to inspection of all owners of real property in the district, as well as to all other interested parties.

The treasurer shall maintain accurate records of all money received by and disbursed for the district. These records may be accumulated and disposed of according to W.S.

9-2-411

and

9-2-412

. The treasurer shall file with the county clerk at the expense of the district, a corporate fidelity bond in an amount not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of his office.

The chairman in addition to his duties as a member of the board shall:

Preside at all meetings of the board;

Sign all resolutions adopted by the board;

Appoint all committees;

Sign, acknowledge and execute all instruments authorized by the board to be executed by the district.

In absence of the chairman or in case of his inability to act, the vice-chairman shall perform the duties of the chairman.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his service a sum fixed by the board not in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for actual attendance at each regular or special meeting of the board or attendance upon any committee meeting, payable monthly. No member of the board shall receive any compensation as an employee of the district whenever the board has determined that a manager should be obtained and has employed such manager as a full-time employee to manage the affairs of and operate the business of the district, but until the services of a full-time manager are required and obtained, any board member may be engaged from time to time or as a part-time employee, and the compensation paid therefor shall not exceed the established prevailing rate of pay for equivalent work. No member of the board shall be interested in any other contract or transaction with the district except in his official representative capacity, and except it be by competitive bidding. If any contract or agreement shall be made in violation of the provisions of this subsection it shall be voidable, and no action shall be maintained thereon by any party thereto against the district. To the extent the district makes any payment thereunder, such contract or agreement shall be valid, and any such payments may be included in any cost defrayed by the levy of special assessments, unless theretofore, the district elects to void the contract or agreement in its entirety and to recover any such payment from the party to whom made.

The district shall be subject to an audit or oversight of its accounts by the director of the state department of audit or his designee as required by W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii). The board of directors shall cause an audit or other oversight to be made of all financial affairs of the district during each fiscal year ending June 30, during the next succeeding six (6) months. If an audit is required, a summary of the financial statement shall be certified by the person making the audit, which shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, one (1) issue during the next succeeding two (2) weeks following the audit. Except as provided in W.S. 9-1-507(d), the audit, if required, shall be made by a certified public accountant, who is not otherwise employed by the district.

The board of county commissioners having jurisdiction of the district may remove directors for cause shown, on petition and after notice and hearing.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.10; Laws 1961, ch. 98, § 1; 1979, ch. 65, § 1; 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1989, ch. 157, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 2001, ch. 108, § 1; 2019 ch. 184, § 1, effective March 8, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 184 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

in (g), deleted "or 16-4-121(f), as applicable" at the end of the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Section 9-1-507(d), referred to in subsection (g), was repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 2.

§ 41-10-111.
Regular and special meetings of board; quorum; majority present required to exercise power; filling of vacancies.

The board shall meet regularly at least once a month at a time and in a place to be designated by the board. Special meetings called by the chairman or any two (2) other directors may be held as often as the needs of the district require, on personal notice to each member of the board or by mail with postage prepaid, at least three (3) days prior to the meeting and addressed at the last known residence of the member as indicated by the records of the district. Three (3) members of the board constitute a quorum at any meeting. A majority of those present is required to perform any duty authorized by this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] except if the bylaws require a larger number. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled until the next subsequent director election as provided in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.11; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 41-10-112.
Subsequent elections of members of board of directors of district.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

District board members shall serve for a term of four (4) years, except that at the first regular subsequent director election following the formation of the district there shall be elected by the voters of the district two (2) members of the board to serve for a term of two (2) years and three (3) members to serve for terms of four (4) years. Thereafter elections shall be held every two (2) years. Each director shall be a voter of the district.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.12; Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 1999, ch. 162, § 1; 2013 ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “taxpaying” before “voter” at the end of (b).